California statutes. Penal Code
(a) No mandated reporter shall be civilly or criminally liable for any report required or authorized by this article, and this immunity shall apply even if the mandated reporter acquired the knowledge or reasonable suspicion of child abuse or neglect outside of their professional capacity or outside the scope of their employment. Any other person reporting a known or suspected instance of child abuse or neglect shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of any report authorized by this article unless it can be proven that a false report was made and the person knew that the report was false or was made with reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the report, and any person who makes a report of child abuse or neglect known to
 be false or with reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the report is liable for any damages caused. No person required to make a report pursuant to this article, nor any person taking photographs at their direction, shall incur any civil or criminal liability for taking photographs of a suspected victim of child abuse or neglect, or causing photographs to be taken of a suspected victim of child abuse or neglect, without parental consent, or for disseminating the photographs, images, or material with the reports required by this article. However, this section shall not be construed to grant immunity from this liability with respect to any other use of the photographs.

(b) Any person, who, pursuant to a request from a government agency investigating a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, provides the requesting agency with
 access to the victim of a known or suspected instance of child abuse or neglect shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of providing that access.

(c) Any commercial computer technician, and any employer of any commercial computer technician, who, pursuant to a warrant from a law enforcement agency investigating a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, provides the law enforcement agency with a computer or computer component which contains possible evidence of a known or suspected instance of child abuse or neglect, shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of providing that computer or computer component to the law enforcement agency.

(d) Any person who, in good faith, provides information or assistance, including medical evaluations or
 consultations, to an agency specified in Section 11165.9, in connection with a report, investigation, or legal intervention pursuant to a good faith report of child abuse or neglect under this article, shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of providing that information or assistance. This subdivision does not grant immunity from liability for an individual who is suspected of committing abuse or neglect of the child who is the subject of the report.

(e) (1) The Legislature finds that even though it has provided immunity from liability to persons required or authorized to make reports pursuant to this article, that immunity does not eliminate the possibility that actions may be brought against those persons based upon required or authorized reports. In order to further limit the financial hardship that
 those persons may incur as a result of fulfilling their legal responsibilities, it is necessary that they not be unfairly burdened by legal fees incurred in defending those actions. Therefore, a mandated reporter may present a claim to the Department of General Services for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in any action against that person on the basis of making a report required or authorized by this article if the court has dismissed the action upon a demurrer or motion for summary judgment made by that person, or if they prevail in the action. The Department of General Services shall allow that claim if the requirements of this subdivision are met, and the claim shall be paid from an appropriation to be made for that purpose. Attorney’s fees awarded pursuant to this section shall not exceed an hourly rate greater than the rate charged by the Attorney General of the State of
 California at the time the award is made and shall not exceed an aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if a public entity has provided for the defense of the action pursuant to Section 995 of the Government Code.

(f) A court may award attorney’s fees and costs to a commercial film and photographic print processor when a suit is brought against the processor because of a disclosure mandated by this article and the court finds this suit to be frivolous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 777, Sec. 17.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.

The Department of Justice, in cooperation with the State Department of Social Services, shall prescribe by regulation guidelines for the investigation of abuse in out-of-home care, as defined in Section 11165.5, and shall ensure that the investigation is conducted in accordance with the regulations and guidelines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 269, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.1.

(a) The Department of Justice, in cooperation with the State Department of Social Services, shall prescribe by regulation guidelines for the investigation of child abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 11165.6, in facilities licensed to care for children, and shall ensure that the investigation is conducted in accordance with the regulations and guidelines.

(b) For community treatment facilities, day treatment facilities, group homes, and foster family agencies, the State
 Department of Social Services shall prescribe the following regulations:

(1) Regulations designed to assure that all licensees and employees of community treatment facilities, day treatment facilities, group homes, and foster family agencies licensed to care for children have had appropriate training, as determined by the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with representatives of licensees, on the provisions of this article.

(2) Regulations designed to assure the community treatment facilities, day treatment facilities, group homes, and foster family agencies licensed to care for children maintain a written protocol for the investigation and reporting of child abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 11165.6, alleged to have occurred involving a child placed in the facility.

(c) The State Department
 of Social Services shall provide such orientation and training as it deems necessary to assure that its officers, employees, or agents who conduct inspections of facilities licensed to care for children are knowledgeable about the reporting requirements of this article and have adequate training to identify conditions leading to, and the signs of, child abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 11165.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 916, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.3.

(a) Whenever a representative of a government agency investigating suspected child abuse or neglect or the State Department of Social Services deems it necessary, a suspected victim of child abuse or neglect may be interviewed during school hours, on school premises, concerning a report of suspected child abuse or neglect that occurred within the child’s home or out-of-home care facility. The child shall be afforded the option of being interviewed in private or selecting any adult who is a member of the staff of the school, including any
 certificated or classified employee or volunteer aide, to be present at the interview. A representative of the agency investigating suspected child abuse or neglect or the State Department of Social Services shall inform the child of that right prior to the interview.

The purpose of the staff person’s presence at the interview is to lend support to the child and enable him or her to be as comfortable as possible. However, the member of the staff so elected shall not participate in the interview. The member of the staff so present shall not discuss the facts or circumstances of the case with the child. The member of the staff so present, including, but not limited to, a volunteer aide, is subject to the confidentiality requirements of this article, a violation of which is punishable as specified in Section 11167.5. A representative of the school shall inform a member of the staff so selected by a child of the requirements of this section prior to the interview. A
 staff member selected by a child may decline the request to be present at the interview. If the staff person selected agrees to be present, the interview shall be held at a time during school hours when it does not involve an expense to the school. Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does not affect the admissibility of evidence in a criminal or civil proceeding.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify each school district and each agency specified in Section 11165.9 to receive mandated reports, and the State Department of Social Services shall notify each of its employees who participate in the investigation of reports of child abuse or neglect, of the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 916, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Child Death Review Teams [11174.32. - 11174.35.]

11174.32.

(a) Each county may establish an interagency child death review team to assist local agencies in identifying and reviewing suspicious child deaths and facilitating communication among persons who perform autopsies and the various persons and agencies involved in child abuse or neglect cases. Interagency child death review teams have been used successfully to ensure that incidents of child abuse or neglect are recognized and other siblings and nonoffending family members receive the appropriate services in cases where a child has expired.

(b) Each county may develop a protocol that may be used as a guideline by persons performing autopsies on children to assist coroners and other persons who perform autopsies in the identification of child abuse or neglect, in the
 determination of whether child abuse or neglect contributed to death or whether child abuse or neglect had occurred prior to but was not the actual cause of death, and in the proper written reporting procedures for child abuse or neglect, including the designation of the cause and mode of death.

(c) In developing an interagency child death review team and an autopsy protocol, each county, working in consultation with local members of the California State Coroners Association and county child abuse prevention coordinating councils, may solicit suggestions and final comments from persons, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Experts in the field of forensic pathology.

(2) Pediatricians with expertise in child abuse.

(3) Coroners and medical
 examiners.

(4) Criminologists.

(5) District attorneys.

(6) Child protective services staff.

(7) Law enforcement personnel.

(8) Representatives of local agencies which are involved with child abuse or neglect reporting.

(9) County health department staff who deals with children’s health issues.

(10) Local professional associations of persons described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive.

(d) Records exempt from disclosure to third parties pursuant to state or federal law shall remain exempt from
 disclosure when they are in the possession of a child death review team.

(e) Written and oral information pertaining to the child's death as requested by a child death review team may be disclosed to a child death review team established pursuant to this section. The team may make a request, in writing, for the information sought and any person with information of the kind described in paragraph (2) may rely on the request in determining whether information may be disclosed to the team.

(1) An individual or agency that has information governed by this subdivision shall not be required to disclose information. The intent of this subdivision is to allow the voluntary disclosure of information by the individual or agency that has the information.

(2) The following information may be disclosed pursuant to this
 subdivision:

(A) Notwithstanding Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, medical information, unless disclosure is prohibited by federal law.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, mental health information.

(C) Notwithstanding Section 11167.5, information from child abuse reports and investigations, except the identity of the person making the report, which shall not be disclosed.

(D) State summary criminal history information, criminal offender record information, and local summary criminal history information, as defined in Sections 11105, 11075, and 13300, respectively.

(E) Notwithstanding Section 11163.2, information pertaining to reports by health
 practitioners of persons suffering from physical injuries inflicted by means of a firearm or of persons suffering physical injury where the injury is a result of assaultive or abusive conduct.

(F) Notwithstanding Section 10850 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, records of in-home supportive services, unless disclosure is prohibited by federal law.

(3) Written or oral information disclosed to a child death review team pursuant to this subdivision shall remain confidential, and shall not be subject to disclosure or discovery by a third party unless otherwise required by law.

(f) (1) No less than once each year, each child death review team shall make available to the public findings, conclusions, and recommendations of the team, including aggregate statistical data on the incidences and causes
 of child deaths.

(2) In its report, the child death review team shall withhold the last name of the child that is subject to a review or the name of the deceased child’s siblings unless the name has been publicly disclosed or is required to be disclosed by state law, federal law, or court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 195.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.33.

Subject to available funding, the Attorney General, working with the California Consortium of Child Abuse Councils, shall develop a protocol for the development and implementation of interagency child death teams for use by counties, which shall include relevant procedures for both urban and rural counties. The protocol shall be designed to facilitate communication among persons who perform autopsies and the various persons and agencies involved in child abuse or neglect cases so that incidents of child abuse or neglect are recognized and other
 siblings and nonoffending family members receive the appropriate services in cases where a child has expired. The protocol shall be completed on or before January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11166.8 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 842, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.34.

(a) (1) The purpose of this section shall be to coordinate and integrate state and local efforts to address fatal child abuse or neglect, and to create a body of information to prevent child deaths.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State Child Death Review Council, the Department of Justice, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Services, and state and local child death review teams shall share data and other information necessary from the Department of Justice Child Abuse Central Index and Supplemental Homicide File, the State Department of Health Services Vital Statistics and the Department of Social Services
 statewide child welfare information system files to establish accurate information on the nature and extent of child abuse- or neglect-related fatalities in California as those documents relate to child fatality cases. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that records of child abuse- or neglect-related fatalities are entered into the State Department of Social Services, statewide child welfare information system. It is also the intent that training and technical assistance be provided to child death review teams and professionals in the child protection system regarding multiagency case review.

(b) (1) It shall be the duty of
 the California State Child Death Review Council to oversee the statewide coordination and integration of state and local efforts to address fatal child abuse or neglect and to create a body of information to prevent child deaths. The Department of Justice, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Coroner’s Association, the County Welfare Directors Association, Prevent Child Abuse California, the California Homicide Investigators Association, the Office of Emergency Services, the Inter-Agency Council on Child Abuse and Neglect/National Center on Child Fatality Review, the California Conference of Local Health Officers, the California Conference of Local Directors of Maternal, Child, and Adolescent Health, the California Conference of Local Health Department Nursing Directors, the California District Attorneys Association, and at least three regional representatives, chosen by the other members of the council, working collaboratively for the purposes
 of this section, shall be known as the California State Child Death Review Council. The council shall select a chairperson or cochairpersons from the members.

(2) The Department of Justice is hereby authorized to carry out the purposes of this section by coordinating council activities and working collaboratively with the agencies and organizations in paragraph (1), and may consult with other representatives of other agencies and private organizations, to help accomplish the purpose of this section.

(c) Meetings of the agencies and organizations involved shall be convened by a representative of the Department of Justice. All meetings convened between the Department of Justice and any organizations required to carry out the purpose of this section shall take place in this state. There shall be a minimum of four meetings per calendar year.

(d) To accomplish the purpose of this section, the Department of Justice and agencies and organizations involved shall engage in the following activities:

(1) Analyze and interpret state and local data on child death in an annual report to be submitted to local child death review teams with copies to the Governor and the Legislature, no later than July 1 each year. Copies of the report shall also be distributed to public officials in the state who deal with child abuse issues and to those agencies responsible for child death investigation in each county. The report shall contain, but not be limited to, information provided by state agencies and the county child death review teams for the preceding year.

The state data shall include the Department of Justice Child Abuse Central Index and Supplemental Homicide File, the State Department of Health
 Services Vital Statistics, and the State Department of Social Services
 statewide child welfare information system.

(2) In conjunction with the Office of Emergency Services, coordinate statewide and local training for county death review teams and the members of the teams, including, but not limited to, training in the application of the interagency child death investigation protocols and procedures established under Sections 11166.7 and 11166.8 to identify child deaths associated with abuse or neglect.

(e) The State Department of Public Health, in collaboration with the California State Child Death Review Council, shall design, test and implement a statewide child abuse or neglect fatality tracking system incorporating information collected by local child death review teams. The department shall:

(1) Establish a minimum case selection criteria
 and review protocols of local child death review teams.

(2) Develop a standard child death review form with a minimum core set of data elements to be used by local child death review teams, and collect and analyze that data.

(3) Establish procedural safeguards in order to maintain appropriate confidentiality and integrity of the data.

(4) Conduct annual reviews to reconcile data reported to the State Department of Health Services Vital Statistics, Department of Justice Homicide Files and Child Abuse Central Index, and the State Department of Social Services statewide child welfare information system
 data systems, with data provided from local child death review teams.

(5) Provide technical assistance to local child death review teams in implementing and maintaining the tracking system.

(6) This subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2000, and shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for its purposes in the Budget Act.

(f) Local child death review teams shall participate in a statewide child abuse or neglect fatalities monitoring system by:

(1) Meeting the minimum standard protocols set forth by the State Department of Public Health in collaboration with the California State Child Death Review Council.

(2) Using the standard data form
 to submit information on child abuse or neglect fatalities in a timely manner established by the State Department of Public Health.

(g) The California State Child Death Review Council shall monitor the implementation of the monitoring system and incorporate the results and findings of the system and review into an annual report.

(h) The Department of Justice shall direct the creation, maintenance, updating, and distribution electronically and by paper, of a statewide child death review team directory, which shall contain the names of the members of the agencies and private organizations participating under this section, and the members of local child death review teams and local liaisons to those teams. The department shall work in collaboration with members of the California State Child Death Review Council to develop a directory of professional experts, resources, and
 information from relevant agencies and organizations and local child death review teams, and to facilitate regional working relationships among teams. The Department of Justice shall maintain and update these directories annually.

(i) The agencies or private organizations participating under this section shall participate without reimbursement from the state. Costs incurred by participants for travel or per diem shall be borne by the participant agency or organization. The participants shall be responsible for collecting and compiling information to be included in the annual report. The Department of Justice shall be responsible for printing and distributing the annual report using available funds and existing resources.

(j) The Office of Emergency Services, in coordination with the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Justice, and the California State Child
 Death Review Council shall contract with state or nationally recognized organizations in the area of child death review to conduct statewide training and technical assistance for local child death review teams and relevant organizations, develop standardized definitions for fatal child abuse or neglect, develop protocols for the investigation of fatal child abuse or neglect, and address relevant issues such as grief and mourning, data collection, training for medical personnel in the identification of child abuse or neglect fatalities, domestic violence fatality review, and other related topics and programs. The provisions of this subdivision shall only be implemented to the extent that the agency can absorb the costs of implementation within its current funding, or to the extent that funds are appropriated for its purposes in the Budget Act.

(k) Law enforcement and child welfare agencies shall cross-report all cases of child death suspected to
 be related to child abuse or neglect whether or not the deceased child has any known surviving siblings.

(l) County child welfare agencies shall create a record in the
 statewide child welfare information system on all cases of child death suspected to be related to child abuse or neglect, whether or not the deceased child has any known surviving siblings. Upon notification that the death was determined not to be related to child abuse or neglect, the child welfare agency shall enter that information into the statewide child welfare information system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.35.

The State Department of Social Services shall work with state and local child death review teams and child protective services agencies in order to identify child death cases that were, or should have been, reported to or by county child protective services agencies. Findings made pursuant to this section shall be used to determine the extent of child abuse or neglect fatalities occurring in families known to child protective services agencies and to define child welfare training needs for reporting, cross-reporting, data integration, and
 involvement by child protective services agencies in multiagency review in child deaths. The State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Services, and the Department of Justice shall develop a plan to track and maintain data on child deaths from abuse or neglect, and submit this plan, not later than December 1, 1997, to the Senate Committee on Health and Human Services, the Assembly Committee on Human Services, and the chairs of the fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11166.95 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 842, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Elder and Dependent Adult Death Review Teams [11174.4. - 11174.9.]

11174.4.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Elder” means any person who is 65 years of age or older.

(b) (1) “Abuse” means any of the conduct described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 15610) of Chapter 11 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Abuse does not include the use of any reasonable and necessary force that may result in an injury used by a peace officer acting within the course of his or her employment as a peace officer.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 301) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.5.

(a) Each county may establish an interagency elder and dependent adult death review team to assist local agencies in identifying and reviewing suspicious elder and dependent adult deaths and facilitating communication among persons who perform autopsies and the various persons and agencies involved in elder and dependent adult abuse or neglect cases.

(b) Each county may develop a protocol that may be used as a guideline by persons performing autopsies on elders and dependent adults to assist coroners and other persons who perform autopsies in the identification of elder and dependent adult abuse or neglect, in the determination of whether elder or dependent adult abuse or neglect contributed to death or whether elder or dependent adult abuse or neglect had occurred prior to, but was not the actual cause of, death, and in the proper written reporting procedures for elder and dependent adult abuse or neglect, including the designation of the cause and mode of death.

(c) As used in this section, the term “dependent adult” has the same meaning as in Section 368, and applies regardless of whether the person lived independently.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 617, Sec. 6.   (SB 110)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.6.

County elder death review teams may be comprised of, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Experts in the field of forensic pathology.

(b) Medical personnel with expertise in elder abuse and neglect.

(c) Coroners and medical examiners.

(d) District attorneys and city attorneys.

(e) County or local staff including, but not limited to:

(1) Adult protective services staff.

(2) Public administrator, guardian, and conservator staff.

(3) County health department staff who deal with elder health issues.

(4) County counsel.

(f) County and state law enforcement personnel.

(g) Local long-term care ombudsman.

(h) Community care licensing staff and investigators.

(i) Geriatric mental health experts.

(j) Criminologists.

(k) Representatives of local agencies that are involved with oversight of adult protective services and reporting elder abuse or neglect.

(l) Local professional associations of persons described in subdivisions (a) to (k), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.7.

(a) An oral or written communication or a document shared within or produced by an elder and dependent adult death review team related to an elder or dependent adult death review is confidential and not subject to disclosure or discoverable by another third party.

(b) An oral or written communication or a document provided by a third party
 to an elder and dependent adult death review team, or between a third party and an elder and dependent adult death review team, is confidential and not subject to disclosure or discoverable by a third party.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), recommendations of an elder and dependent adult death review team upon the completion of a review may be disclosed at the discretion of a majority of the members of the elder and dependent adult death review team.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 617, Sec. 7.   (SB 110)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.8.

(a) Each organization represented on an elder death review team may share with other members of the team information in its possession concerning the decedent who is the subject of the review or any person who was in contact with the decedent and any other information deemed by the organization to be pertinent to the review. Any information shared by an organization with other members of a team is confidential. The intent of this subdivision is to permit the disclosure to members of the team of any information deemed confidential,
 privileged, or prohibited from disclosure by any other provision of law.

(b) (1) Written and oral information may be disclosed to an elder death review team established pursuant to this section. The team may make a request in writing for the information sought and any person with information of the kind described in paragraph (3) may rely on the request in determining whether information may be disclosed to the team.

(2) No individual or agency that has information governed by this subdivision shall be required to disclose information. The intent of this subdivision is to allow the voluntary disclosure of information by the individual or agency that has the information.

(3) The following information may be disclosed pursuant to this subdivision:

(A) Notwithstanding Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, medical information.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, mental health information.

(C) Notwithstanding Section 15633.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, information from elder abuse reports and investigations, except the identity of persons who have made reports, which shall not be disclosed.

(D) State summary criminal history information, criminal offender record information, and local summary criminal history information, as defined in Sections 11075, 11105, and 13300.

(E) Notwithstanding Section 11163.2, information pertaining to reports by health practitioners of persons suffering from physical
 injuries inflicted by means of a firearm or of persons suffering physical injury where the injury is a result of assaultive or abusive conduct.

(F) Information provided to probation officers in the course of the performance of their duties, including, but not limited to, the duty to prepare reports pursuant to Section 1203.10, as well as the information on which these reports are based.

(G) Notwithstanding Section 10825 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, records relating to in-home supportive services, unless disclosure is prohibited by federal law.

(c) Written and oral information may be disclosed under this section notwithstanding Sections 2263, 2918, 4982, and 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, the lawyer-client privilege protected by Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of
 the Evidence Code, the physician-patient privilege protected by Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, and the psychotherapist-patient privilege protected by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.9.

Information gathered by the elder death review team and any recommendations made by the team shall be used by the county to develop education, prevention, and if necessary, prosecution strategies that will lead to improved coordination of services for families and the elder population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Uniform Act for Out-of-State Parolee Supervision [11175. - 11179.]

11175.

This article may be cited as the Uniform Act for Out-of-State Probationer or Parolee Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

11176.

Pursuant to the authority vested in this State by that certain act of Congress, approved June 6, 1934, and entitled “An act granting the consent of Congress to any two or more states to enter into agreements or compacts for cooperative effort and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime, and for other purposes,” the Governor is hereby authorized and directed to enter into a compact or compacts on behalf of this State with any of the United States legally joining therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1384.)
-------------------------------------------

11177.

The compact or compacts authorized by Section 11176 shall be in substantially the following form:

A compact entered into by and among the contracting states, signatories hereto, with the consent of the Congress of the United States of America, granted by an act entitled “An act granting the consent of Congress to any two or more states to enter into agreements or compacts for cooperative effort and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime and for other purposes.”

The contracting states solemnly agree:

(1) That it shall be
 competent for the duly constituted judicial and administrative authorities of a state party to this compact (herein called “sending state”), to permit any person convicted of an offense within such state and placed on probation or released on parole to reside in any other state party to this compact (herein called “receiving state”) while on probation or parole, if

(a) Such person is in fact a resident of or has his family residing within the receiving state and can obtain employment there;

(b) Though not a resident of the receiving state and not having his family residing there, the receiving state consents to such person being sent there.

Before granting such permission, opportunity shall be granted to the receiving state to investigate the home and prospective employment of such person.

A
 resident of the receiving state, within the meaning of this section, is one who has been an actual inhabitant of such state continuously for more than one year prior to his coming to the sending state and has not resided within the sending state more than six continuous months immediately preceding the commission of the offense for which he has been convicted.

(2) That each receiving state will assume the duties of visitation of and supervision over probationers or parolees of any sending state and in the exercise of those duties will be governed by the same standards that prevail for its own probationers and parolees.

(3) That duly accredited officers of a sending state may at all times enter a receiving state and there apprehend and retake any person on probation or parole. For that purpose no formalities will be required other than establishing the authority of the officer and
 the identity of the person to be retaken. All legal requirements to obtain extradition of fugitives from justice are hereby expressly waived on the part of states party hereto, as to such persons. The decision of the sending state to retake a person on probation or parole shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state. If at the time when a state seeks to retake a probationer or parolee there should be pending against him within the receiving state any criminal charge, or he should be suspected of having committed within such state a criminal offense, he shall not be retaken without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or from imprisonment for such offense.

(4) That the duly accredited officers of the sending state will be permitted to transport prisoners being retaken through any and all states parties to this compact, without interference.

(5) That the governor of each state may designate an officer who, acting jointly with like officers of other contracting states, if and when appointed, shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be deemed necessary to more effectively carry out the terms of this compact.

(6) That this compact shall become operative immediately upon its ratification by any state as between it and any other state or states so ratifying. When ratified it shall have the full force and effect of law within such state, the form of ratification to be in accordance with the laws of the ratifying state.

(7) That this compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each ratifying state until renounced by it. The duties and obligations hereunder of a renouncing state shall continue as to parolees or probationers residing therein at
 the time of withdrawal until retaken or finally discharged by the sending state. Renunciation of this compact shall be by the same authority which ratified it, by sending six months’ notice in writing of its intention to withdraw from the compact to the other states party hereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1384.)
-------------------------------------------

11177.1.

(a) Before a probationer or parolee may be returned to the sending state under this compact, he shall have a right to counsel and to a hearing before a magistrate to determine whether he is in fact a probationer or parolee who was allowed to reside in this or any other state pursuant to this compact, whether his return to the sending state has been ordered, and whether there is probable cause to believe he is the same person whose return is sought. At the hearing, the magistrate shall accept certified copies of probation or parole documents showing that this compact has been invoked and that the probationer or parolee has been